Idaho statutes. Title 56 PUBLIC ASSISTANCE AND WELFARE
Chapter 4
COOPERATIVE WELFARE FUND

Sec.

§ 56-401. Creation of cooperative welfare fund — Purpose.

There is hereby created a trust fund in the state treasury to be known as the cooperative welfare fund, and all money deposited therein is perpetually appropriated for public welfare purposes.

§ 56-402. Sources of cooperative welfare fund.

There shall be placed in the cooperative welfare fund all federal grants-in-aid made to the state of Idaho under titles I, IV and X, and part 3 of title V of the act of congress known as the Social Security Act, as amended; all cooperative funds received from the counties under the provisions of the public assistance law; and any funds received from federal, state, personal, or other sources, subject to administration by the director of the department of health and welfare for public assistance and welfare purposes.

§ 56-403. Budget estimate — Requisition for funds.

At the beginning of each calendar quarter, or oftener, the director of the department of health and welfare shall make and file with the state board of examiners for examination a claim upon the general fund for funds appropriated to the department of health and welfare in an amount estimated to be sufficient to meet the needs of such department for the period. Such claim shall be supported by such estimates of anticipated expenditures as the board may require.

§ 56-404. Transfer of funds from general fund to welfare fund.

Upon the approval of the claim upon the general fund by the state board of examiners, the state controller and the state treasurer shall transfer the approved amount from the general fund to the cooperative welfare fund. Any unexpended balance in the cooperative welfare fund at the end of any month shall be subject to disbursement in accordance with the terms of this act in any subsequent month.

§ 56-405. Administration and disbursement of funds.

Disbursements from the cooperative welfare fund, involving the participation of federal funds, which may be made available only upon condition that they are to be administered by a single state agency, shall be made upon claims approved by the director of the department of health and welfare.

All other disbursements from the cooperative welfare fund shall be made upon claims submitted to and approved by the state board of examiners as are other claims against the state.

§ 56-406. Procedure for making disbursements.

For disbursements as described in section 56-405(a), Idaho Code, the director shall make requisition to the state controller upon vouchers, showing the director’s approval of such disbursements, and certifying to the participation therein of federal funds as described in said section 56-405(a), Idaho Code. Upon the presentation of such vouchers, the state controller shall issue warrants on the state treasury against the cooperative welfare fund, payable to the persons named by the director in the amounts allowed by it, as indicated upon the vouchers. Such warrants shall be transmitted by the state controller to the director of the department of health and welfare for distribution. Requisitions and vouchers for disbursements described in section 56-405(a), Idaho Code, shall be subject to examination by the state controller in order to determine that the account is in proper form, that the totals carried thereon are correct, and that there are funds in the state treasury out of which the same may lawfully be paid.

§ 56-407. Transfer of funds from cooperative emergency revenue fund.

All money in the cooperative emergency revenue fund on the effective date of this act are hereby transferred and appropriated to the cooperative welfare fund; and all obligations incurred against the cooperative emergency revenue fund which are outstanding on such date shall be payable from the cooperative welfare fund; and all references to the cooperative emergency revenue fund shall hereafter be construed to apply to the cooperative welfare fund.

§ 56-408 — 56-449. [Reserved.]

The director of the department of health and welfare may receive, on behalf of the department, any money or real or personal property donated, bequeathed, devised, or conditionally granted to the department. Such moneys received directly or derived from the sale of such property shall be deposited by the state treasurer in a special account to be known as the “Health and Welfare Trust Account”, which is hereby established, reserved, set aside, appropriated and made available until expended, used, and administered to carry out the terms or conditions of such donation, bequest, devise, or grant. Pending such expenditure or use, surplus moneys in the health and welfare trust account shall be invested by the state treasurer in the manner provided for idle state moneys in the state treasury by section 67-1210, Idaho Code. Interest received on all such investments shall be paid into the health and welfare trust account.

The director shall provide annually, to the legislative council through the director of legislative services, an accounting of the health and welfare trust account setting forth the sources, applications and balance of moneys within the account.

§ 56-460. County medical indigency suspense account. [Repealed.]

§ 56-450. Health and welfare trust account.